test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v2_lenttaat_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - lenttäät - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     lenttäät+V+Inf: lenttäät
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lennän
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lennät
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lenttää
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: lennämä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: lennättä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lennethään
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lensin
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lensit
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lensi
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: lensimä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: lensittä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lennethiin
     lenttäät+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: lentäny
     lenttäät+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: lennetty
     lenttäät+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: lentänheet
     lenttäät+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lenttäävä
     lenttäät+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: lenttäävät
     lenttäät+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lennettävä
     lenttäät+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: lennettävät

     lenttäät+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: lentäisin
     lenttäät+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: lentäisit
     lenttäät+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: lentäis
     lenttäät+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: lentäisimmä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: lentäisittä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: lennettäis
     lenttäät+V+Pass+Cond: lennettäis

     lenttäät+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: lennä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: lentäkkää
     
     lenttäät+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: lentämässä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: lentämästä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: lentämhään
     lenttäät+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: lentämällä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: lentämättä
